Nebraska, session 109, LB897.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB897 LB897
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-520.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-520.02 (1) Any person violating the statewide open burning ban
established by section 81-520.01 or violating sections 81-520.03 to
81-520.05 shall be guilty of a Class III IV misdemeanor.
(2) In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this
section, a municipality or rural or suburban fire protection district may
charge a fee to such person to cover the costs incurred by a municipality
or rural or suburban fire protection district in responding to and
extinguishing any fire resulting from a violation of sections 81-520.01
or 81-520.03 to 81-520.05. Municipalities and rural and urban fire
protection districts may establish a fee structure consistent with the
approximate cost for responding to and extinguishing such fire.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-520.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-